Illinois, session 104th, HB1087.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)7    Sec. 10-20.88. Single-use plastics prohibition. 8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Compostable" means that the item meets the ASTM D6400 10standard of compostability and has been certified by the 11Biodegradable Products Institute as compostable.12    "Compostable foodware" means containers, bowls, straws, 13plates, trays, cartons, cups, lids, forks, spoons, knives, and 14other items that are designed for one-time use for beverages, 15prepared food, or leftovers from meals that are compostable.16    "Disposable food service container" means serviceware 17designed for one-time use. "Disposable food service container" 18includes, but is not limited to, serviceware for take-out 19foods, bakery products, and leftovers from partially consumed 20meals. "Disposable food service container" does not include 21polystyrene foam coolers, egg carton containers, ice chests 22that are used for the processing or shipping of seafood, or 23serviceware that is used to contain, transport, or otherwise   HB1087- 2 -LRB104 05569 LNS 15599 b1package raw, uncooked, or butchered meat, poultry, fish, or 2seafood.3    "Polystyrene foam" means blown polystyrene and expanded or 4extruded foams using a styrene monomer.5    "Recyclable foodware" means items that are designed for 6one-time use for beverages, prepared food, or leftovers from 7meals and that are commonly accepted in local curbside 8residential recycling pick up.9    "Serviceware" means a container, bowl, plate, tray, 10carton, cup, lid, or other item designed to contain, 11transport, serve, or aid in the consumption of food or 12beverages.13    (b) After January 1, 2027, a school district may not 14procure disposable food service containers that are composed 15in whole or in part from polystyrene foam for use at any school 16and instead shall offer only compostable foodware or 17recyclable foodware for use at the school.18    (c) After January 1, 2028 or at the renewal of its next 19contract, whichever occurs later, no vendor contracted through 20a school district may provide a school with disposable food 21service containers that are composed in whole or in part from 22polystyrene foam at any site owned or leased by the school 23district and instead shall offer only compostable foodware or 24recyclable foodware for use at sites owned or leased by the 25school district.   HB1087- 3 -LRB104 05569 LNS 15599 b1    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)2    Sec. 34-18.88. Single-use plastics prohibition. 3    (a) As used in this Section:4    "Compostable" means that the item meets the ASTM D6400 5standard of compostability and has been certified by the 6Biodegradable Products Institute as compostable.7    "Compostable foodware" means containers, bowls, straws, 8plates, trays, cartons, cups, lids, forks, spoons, knives, and 9other items that are designed for one-time use for beverages, 10prepared food, or leftovers from meals that are compostable.11    "Disposable food service container" means serviceware 12designed for one-time use. "Disposable food service container" 13includes, but is not limited to, serviceware for take-out 14foods, bakery products, and leftovers from partially consumed 15meals. "Disposable food service container" does not include 16polystyrene foam coolers, egg carton containers, ice chests 17that are used for the processing or shipping of seafood, or 18serviceware that is used to contain, transport, or otherwise 19package raw, uncooked, or butchered meat, poultry, fish, or 20seafood.21    "Polystyrene foam" means blown polystyrene and expanded or 22extruded foams using a styrene monomer.23    "Recyclable foodware" means items that are designed for 24one-time use for beverages, prepared food, or leftovers from 25meals and that are commonly accepted in local curbside 26residential recycling pick up.  HB1087- 4 -LRB104 05569 LNS 15599 b1    "Serviceware" means a container, bowl, plate, tray, 2carton, cup, lid, or other item designed to contain, 3transport, serve, or aid in the consumption of food or 4beverages.5    (b) After January 1, 2027, the school district may not 6procure disposable food service containers that are composed 7in whole or in part from polystyrene foam for use at any school 8and instead shall offer only compostable foodware or 9recyclable foodware for use at the school.10    (c) After January 1, 2028 or at the renewal of its next 11contract, whichever occurs later, no vendor contracted through 12the school district may provide a school with disposable food 13service containers that are composed in whole or in part from 14polystyrene foam at any site owned or leased by the school 15district and instead shall offer only compostable foodware or 16recyclable foodware for use at sites owned or leased by the 17school district.